hfst-tools/hfst-lexc/test/divvun-sme/sme-lex.txt
LEXICON LOSSAT !Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. a-Attr. and final t
 +A+Attr:a%> ATTR ;
 +A:ad%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
! +A+Comp:i%>X4b BUStem ;  !Replaced to avoid adverb losibut etc.
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom:i%>X4b K ;
 +A+Comp+Attr:i%>X4b ATTR ; !SUB
! +A+Comp:i%>X4b VUOHTA ; !XXX Really?
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen:i%>X4b K ; !SUB
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc:i%>X4b K ; !SUB
 +A+Comp+Pl+Nom:i%>X4but K ;
 +A+Comp+Ess:i%>X4bun K ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Attr:i»X4buš%> ATTR ; !SUB
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4bužž JOHTOLAT0 ;
! +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin:i»X4bužž VUOHTA ; !XXX
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4bužža%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
 +A+Comp:i%>X4bu MALLASI-/NUORABU- ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom:i%>X4bu PxSgV ; !^P^
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu PxSgV ; !^P^
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu PxSgV ; !^P^
 +A+Comp+Sg+Ill:i%>X4busa PxV ; !^P^
 +A+Comp+Pl+Nom:i%>X4buiddá Px1V ; !^P^
! +A+Superl:i%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; !Replaced to avoid adverb losimusat etc.
 +A+Superl+Attr:i%>X4mus%> K ; ! Attributive superlatives
 +A+Superl:i%>X4muss JOHTOLAT0 ;
! +A+Superl:i%>X4mus VUOHTA ; !XXX Really?
 +A+Superl+Ess:i%>X4mussa%>n K ;
 +A+Superl+Adv:%>ad%>epmos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Adv:%>ad%>amos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Sg+Nom:i%>X4mussa PxV ; !^P^
 +A+Superl+Ess:i%>X4mussa%>n PxC ; !^P^
 +A+Superl:i%>X4mussa%> EABBUCASE2 ;
 +A:ad%>X2 GAPPUS- ;
 +A:ad%> GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON CAVGAT !Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Bisyll. a/es-Attr. and final t, both -but and -eappot comparatives
 +A+Attr:a%> ATTR ;
 +A+Attr:e%>Y9s ATTR ;
 +A:ad%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
! +A:ga%> BU/MUS ; causes adv čavggat, replaced by next two:
 +A+Comp:ga%>b BUStem ;
 +A+Superl:ga%>muss BUOREMUS ;
 +A:ad%>X2 GAPPUS- ;
 +A:ad%> GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON CIENAL !Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj. with Strong Grade is-Attr.
 +A+Attr:%>X2is ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 GAPPUS- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;
! +A:%>X2 GARRAS- ; ! GARRAS- removed
! +A:%>X4 GARAS0 ; ! GARAS0 removed

LEXICON NJUORAS !Trisyll. Gradating C-Adj., with Strong Grade a-Attr.
 +A+Attr:%> ATTR ;
 :s GAPPUS ;

LEXICON DILDDAS ! ,-ld-(#=is) Trisyll Grad., facult is-Attr.
 +A+Attr:%>X4is ATTR ;
 GAPPUS ;

LEXICON VUOGAS ! Trisyll. adj. with gradation I-III and no sep. attr.
 +A+Attr:%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;
 +A:%>Y9 GAPPUS- ;
 +A:%>Y9 EABBO/EAMOS ;

LEXICON HEAHKAS ! ,-hkk-#=is heahkka Trisyll Grad., is-Attr & heahkka
 +A+Attr:%>X4sis ATTR ;
 GARAS ;

LEXICON EATTAS ! ,-dd-#=is Trisyll. Grad. C-Adj. with WeG is-Attr.
 +A+Attr:%>X4is ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 GAPPUS- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON BOAKKAS ! ,-gg-#boagge9- Trisyll
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 GAPPUS- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;
 +A+SgNomCmp#:»X7# NAMAT ;


LEXICON FARGAT ! :d#Ø Trisyll
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%> GAPPUS- ;
 +A:%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +A+SgNomCmp#:»X7# NAMAT ;


LEXICON GAPPUS ! -bbo- Trisyll
 +A+Attr:%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 GAPPUS- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON VATTIS ! Trisyll CG, -es/-is Attr
 +A+Attr:%>W1 ATTR ;
 +A+Attr:%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 GAPPUS- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON BIEKKUS ! ,-iggo-#=is Trisyll Grad, is-Attr,
 +A+Attr:%>X4is ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 GAPPUS- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON LIEKKUS ! ,-iggo-(#=is)
 +A+Attr:%>X4 ATTR ;
 BIEKKUS ;

LEXICON GUOROS
! guoro9s,-u8rro- = guorus,-u8rro-#guoro9s
 +A+Attr:%>W1 ATTR ;
 +A+Ess:%>W1in K ;
 +A+Sg+Nom:%>W1 K ;
 +A:%>X2 GAPPUS- ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;


LEXICON NUOLUS ! ,-u8llo-(#nuolo9s)
 +A+Attr:%>W1 ATTR ;
 GAPPUS ;

LEXICON GEARGGUS ! ,-ergo-#gearggo9s
 +A+Attr:%>W1 ATTR ;
 +A:%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:%>X2 GAPPUS- ;
 +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;

LEXICON VUDDJII !
! +A+Adv:%>it K ; !these probably don´t form adverbs
 +A+Attr:%>Y5s ATTR ;
 +A:%>jW1 MALES ;
 +A:%>j GAPPUS0 ;
 +A:%>Y5 FALLA- ;
! +A:%>Y5 BU/MUS ; ! Nickel: vanligvis ubøyelige
 : VUOHTA ;

 LEXICON JIEDNAI
 +A+Adv:%>jit K ;
 +A+Attr:%>Q3s ATTR ;
 +A:%>jW1 MALES ;
 +A:%>j GAPPUS0 ;
 +A:%>Y5 FALLA- ;
! +A:%>Y5 BU/MUS ; !Replaced to prevent adv. form jiednát
 +A+Comp:%>Y5b BUStem ;
 +A+Superl:%>Y5muss BUOREMUS ;
 : VUOHTA ;

!LEXICON RAHKIS ! As BOARIS, but with facultative -is -Attr !SAME AS VATTIS
! +A+Attr:i%>X4s ATTR ;
! +A+Attr:e%>X4s ATTR ;
! +A:ás%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
! +A:is VUOHTA ; !SUB
! +A:is%>X2 GAPPUS- ; ! as VATTIS
! +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! as VATTIS

LEXICON BOARIS ! As GAPPUS, but with different attr.
 +A+Attr:%>W1s ATTR ;
 +A:s%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A:s%>X2 GAPPUS- ;
 +A:s%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;


LEXICON AKTIIVA
 +A+Attr:%> ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
!Modeled on the basis of NUORRA

LEXICON BOREALA !AKTIIVA without comparatives
 +A+Attr:%> ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;


LEXICON ALLAT
 +A+Attr:a%> ATTR ;
! +A+Comp:i%>X4b BUStem ; !Replaced to avoid adverb alibut etc.
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom:i%>X4t K ;
 +A+Comp+Attr:i%>X4t K ;
! +A+Comp:i%>X4b VUOHTA ; !XXX
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen:i%>X4b K ; !SUB
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc:i%>X4b K ; !SUB
 +A+Comp+Pl+Nom:i%>X4but K ;
 +A+Comp+Ess:i%>X4bun K ;
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Attr:i»X4buš%> ATTR ; !SUB
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4bužž JOHTOLAT0 ;
! +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin:i»X4bužž VUOHTA ; !XXX
 +A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+A:i»X4bužža%> BUOREMUSSA- ;
 +A+Comp:i%>X4bu MALLASI-/NUORABU- ;
 +A+Comp+Adv:ad%>eappo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Adv:ag%>eappo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Adv:ad%>abbo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Adv:ag%>abbo%>t K ;
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom:i%>X4bu PxSgV ; !^P^
 +A+Comp+Sg+Gen:i%>X4bu PxSgV ; !^P^
 +A+Comp+Sg+Acc:i%>X4bu PxSgV ; !^P^
 +A+Comp+Sg+Ill:i%>X4busa PxV ; !^P^
 +A+Comp+Pl+Nom:i%>X4buiddá Px1V ; !^P^
! +A+Superl:i%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; !!Replaced to avoid adverb alimusat etc.
 +A+Superl+Attr:i%>X4mus K ;
 +A+Superl:i%>X4muss JOHTOLAT0 ;
! +A+Superl:i%>X4mus VUOHTA ; !SUB
 +A+Superl+Ess:i%>X4mussa%>n K ;
 +A+Superl+Adv:ad%>epmos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Adv:ag%>epmos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Adv:ad%>amos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Adv:ag%>amos%>it K ;
 +A+Superl+Sg+Nom:i%>X4mussa PxV ; !^P^
 +A+Superl+Ess:i%>X4mussa%>n PxC ; !^P^
 +A+Superl:i%>X4mussa%> EABBUCASE2 ;
 +A:ad ALLAGA ;
 +A:ag ALLAGA ;
 +A:ad%> ADVC ;
 +A:ag%> ADVC ;

LEXICON ALLAGA
 00:%>i MALLASI-/NUORABU- ; !^B^ doesn't work ...
! EABBO/EAMOS ; ! Comp her should only be -bu.
 :%> GAPPUS- ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
 : VUOHTA ;
 +SgNomCmp#:»X7# NAMAT ;





! Contracted adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON FIINNIS ! ,-dná-(:Ø)#fiinna
 +A+Attr:a%>X4 ATTR ;
! +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! replaced
 +A:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 +A:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
! +A:á%>Y5 FIIDNA- ; ! replaced
 +A:á%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +A:á%>Y5s MALLAS- ;


 LEXICON DEAHTIS ! as fiinnis, but with StrGr in Attr
 +A+Attr:%>a ATTR ;
 +A:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! Nom and Ess
 +A:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
 +A:á%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +A:á%>Y5s MALLAS- ;

LEXICON SMAVIS ! as deahtis, but with even more Attr forms
! +A+Attr:i%>X4s ATTR ; !Smávislágán hardcoded, otherwise attr. is smávva
 +A+Comp:i%>X4b BUStem ; ! smávit
 +A+Superl:i%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; ! smávimus
 +A:ás%> ADVC ;
 : DEAHTIS ;

LEXICON STUORIS ! As fiinnis, but with different comparation
 +A+Attr:a%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Adv:á%>Y5t K ;
 +A+Comp:i%>X4b BUStem ; ! stuorit
 +A+Comp:á%>X4b BUStem ; ! stuorát
 +A+Superl:i%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; ! stuorimus
 +A+Superl:á%>X4muss BUOREMUS ; ! stuorámus
 +A:á%>Y5 FALLA- ;

LEXICON NJALGGAT
! ,-lgá-:Ø#njálgga = njálggis,-lgá-: Ø#njálgga =
! njálgga,-lgá-:Ø#njálgga (komp., superl. njálgá- = njálga3s-)
 +A+Attr:a%>X4 ATTR ;
! +A:%>X4 GARAS0 ; ! removed
! +A:%>X4 GAPPUS0 ; ! replaced
 +A:ah%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;
 +A:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 +A:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
! +A:á%>Y5 FIIDNA- ; !replaced
 +A:á%>Y5 FALLA- ;

LEXICON CAPPIS
 +A+Attr:a%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +A:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 +A:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
! +A:á%>Y5 FIIDNA- ; ! replaced
  +A:á%>Y5 FALLA- ;

LEXICON VIISSIS  ! Contr, CG and -is -> -á, attr -es/-is
 +A+Attr:es%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A+Attr:is%>X4 ATTR ;
 +A:is%>X4 GAPPUS0 ;  ! Nom and Ess
 +A+Comp:át SHORTCOMP ;
! THEN COMPARATIVE, here tentative
 +A:ás%>X2 EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 +A:á%>Y5 BU/MUS ;
! +A:á%>Y5 FIIDNA- ; ! replaced
 +A:á%>Y5 FALLA- ;
 +A:á%>Y5s MALLAS- ;


! ------------- !
! Special cases !
! ------------- !

!LEXICON ACTIOCOMPOUNDS !via BOAHTIN and EAPMI
! :@C.NeedNoun@ R ;
! # VEARA ;

LEXICON VEARA
 +Der3+Der/veara+A+Sg+Nom:»veara%> K ;
 +Der3+Der/veara+A+Attr:»veara%> K ;
 +Der3+Der/veara+A+Sg+Ess:»veara%>n K ;




! Final note on the adjective sublexica
!-------------------------------------

! todo: Rewrite the adj lexica so that the attr variation is kept separate
! from the otherwise uniform declension.



! --------------------------- !
! Sublexica for nominal stems !
! --------------------------- !



! Declension
! ----------


! Noun declension
! - - - - - - - -

LEXICON DEVNVCASE
 GOAHTI-NE ;
 :X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 :X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :X8 GOADE- ; ! SUB! Ditto (?)
 GOAHTE- ;	!SUB

LEXICON GOAHTI-NE !Bisyll. V-Nouns; Nominative Sg. and Essive
 NomV ;
 EssV ;

LEXICON NomV
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: Px3V ; !^P^
 +SgNomCmp: R ;
 +Der/viđá+Adv:»viđá K ;
! +Der/viđi+Adv:»viđi K ;


LEXICON EssV
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Ess:n PxC ; !^P^

LEXICON GOAHTI-OBL
 :X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade abs decl
 :X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)


LEXICON GOAHTE-
! +Sg+Nom:X7 R ;
 +SgCmp:W3 R ; !SUB !Wild compounds. Check comment to next pointer (TO)
! +SgNomCmp: R ; ! No wild compounds, but Nom in the tag.I don't agree,
                 !  cause we don't know the case when there is second syllable deletion (TO)
 :X7 MALES ;

LEXICON GOAHTICMP
 +SgNomCmp:X7 R ;
 +SgCmp:W3 R ; !SUB

LEXICON GOAHTILONGCMP
 +SgNomCmp: R ;

LEXICON GOAHTILONGSHORTCMP
 +SgNomCmp: R ;
 +SgNomCmp:X7 R ;
 +SgCmp:W3 R ;		!SUB



LEXICON GOADE-
 +Sg+Gen: K ;   !^NG^ ! This escape hatch for X8 gives gieldda as Gen of gieldá.
 +SgGenCmp: R ; !Note! Same entry under GOADI-


LEXICON GOAHTA-
 +Sg+Nom: Px1V ; !^P^
 +Sg+Gen: Px1V ; !^P^
 +Sg+Acc: Px1V ; !^P^
 +Sg+Nom: Px2V ; !^P^
 +Sg+Ill:s PxC ; !^P^

LEXICON GOAHTAI
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;

LEXICON GOADI-
 +Sg+Gen: K ;
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +SgGenCmp: R ; !^NG^  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Sg+Gen: Px3V ; !^P^
 +Sg+Acc: Px3V ; !^P^
 +Sg+Loc:s K ;
 +Sg+Loc:n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:st PxC ; !^P^
 +Pl+Nom:t K ;
 +Pl+Nom:k K ; !SUB

LEXICON GODII-
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:jn PxC ; !^P^
 +Pl+Nom:jd Px1C ; !^P^
 +Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
 +PlGenCmp:jd R ;
 +Pl+Gen:jd PxC ; !^P^
 +Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd PxC ; !^P^
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdasa PxV ; !^P^
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:js K ; !SUB !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc:jn PxC ; !^P^
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:jd PxPlComC ; !^P^

LEXICON GOADA-
 +Sg+Gen: Px2V ; !^P^
 +Sg+Acc: Px2V ; !^P^



LEXICON STAHTACASE
 GOAHTI-NE ;
 GOAHTA- ;
! :X3 GOAHTAI ; ! POINTED TO IN MOTHER LEXICA
 GOADI- ;
 GODII- ;
 GOADA- ;
 GOADE- ;
 MALES ;



LEXICON HEANDARAT-COMM ! this lexicon is differet from HEANDARAT in one
 +N:00 JOHTOLAT0 ;     ! respect: it does not have the Prop tag.
 +N:a%> JOHTOLAHKA- ;
 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:a»X6ž DIMINC ;


LEXICON MALIS0
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +SgNomCmp:X7 R ;
 +Der/viđá+Adv:»X7#viđá K ;
! +Der/viđi+Adv:»X7#viđi K ;
 +Ess:in K ;
! +Ess:ini PxV ; !^P^ ! No +Px when 3-syll. Ess-form
! Almost id. to GAPPUS0.
! MALIS0 has no VUOHTA,
! GAPPUS0 has no Px Ess.

LEXICON MALLAS-
 +Sg+Nom:00 PxC ; !^P^
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ; !SUB
 +SgGenCmp:a R ; !SUB !compound also for these
 +SgGenCmp: R ; !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen: PxC ; !^P^
 +Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +Sg+Acc: K ; !SUB
 +Sg+Acc: PxC ; !^P^
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ak K ; !SUB
 +Sg+Ill:asa PxV ; !^P^
 +Pl+Nom:ijddá Px1V ; !^P^
 :i MALLASI-/NUORABU- ;
